Utah statutes.
76-7-321.   Contraceptive and abortion services -- Funds -- Minor -- Definitions.

As used in Sections 76-7-321 through 76-7-325:

(1)  "Abortion services" means any material, program, plan, or undertaking which seeks to promote abortion, encourages individuals to obtain an abortion, or provides abortions.

(2)  "Contraceptive services" means any material, program, plan, or undertaking that is used for instruction on the use of birth control devices and substances, encourages individuals to use birth control methods, or provides birth control devices.

(3)  "Funds" means any money, supply, material, building, or project provided by this state or its political subdivisions.

(4)  "Minor" means any person under the age of 18 who is not otherwise emancipated, married, or a member of the armed forces of the United States.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

